Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,101
License plates; when issued; validation decals.

(1) License plates shall be issued every six years beginning with the license plates issued in the year 2005.

(2) In the years in which license plates are not issued, in lieu of issuing such license plates, the department shall furnish to every person whose motor vehicle or trailer is registered one or two validation decals, as the case may be. Such validation decals shall bear the year for which issued and be so constructed as to permit them to be permanently affixed to the license plates.

(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,203 and 60-3,228 and license plates issued for commercial fertilizer trailers pursuant to section 60-3,151.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 101;

Laws 2016, LB783, § 6;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 21;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 19.